test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IN_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IN_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IN_STEM_2

     ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda éenaa kyáambda
     ín+V+INDIRECT+PAST: kyáambda éenaan kyáambda
     ín+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kyáambda éenaas kyáambda
     ín+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda éenaa.ang kyáambda
     ín+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kyáambda éen'ahlanggang kyáambda
     ín+V+CERTAIN+PAST: kyáambda éen'ahlanggan kyáambda
     ín+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda éen'ahlanggiinii kyáambda
     ín+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kyáambda éen'ahlans kyáambda
     ín+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: kyáambda éenaa'ahlang kyáambda
     ín+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kyáambda éenaa'ahlanggaa kyáambda
     ín+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kyáambda éenaa'ahlanggang kyáambda
     ín+V+REFLEXIVE: kyáambda éen'ahl kyáambda
